Maryland, session 2025, HB1427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
2–113.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Council” means the Maryland Zero Emission Electric Vehicle
Infrastructure Council.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1427*

HOUSE BILL 1427
(3) “Fuel cell electric vehicle” has the meaning stated in § 11–125.1 of this
article.
(4) “Plug–in electric drive vehicle” has the meaning stated in § 11–145.1 of
this article.
(5) “Zero emission electric vehicle” includes:
(i) A plug–in electric drive vehicle; and
(ii) A fuel cell electric vehicle.
(b) There is a Maryland Zero Emission Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Council.
(c) The Council consists of the following members:
(1) One member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) Two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) The Secretary of Planning, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) The Secretary of the Environment, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) The Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) The Secretary of General Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(8) THE SECRETARY OF STATE POLICE, OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE;
[(8)] (9) The Executive Director of the Technical Staff of the Maryland
Public Service Commission, or the Executive Director’s designee;
[(9)] (10) The Director of the Maryland Energy Administration, or the
Director’s designee;
[(10)] (11) The People’s Counsel, or the People’s Counsel’s designee; and
[(11)] (12) The following members appointed by the Governor:

HOUSE BILL 1427 3
(i) One representative of an institution of higher education in the
State with expertise in energy, transportation, or the environment;
(ii) Two representatives of the Maryland Association of Counties,
including:
1. A representative who resides in a rural region of the State;
and
2. A representative who resides in an urban or suburban
region of the State;
(iii) Two representatives of the Maryland Municipal League,
including:
1. A representative who resides in a rural region of the State;
and
2. A representative who resides in an urban or suburban
region of the State;
(iv) One representative of an electric vehicle driver advocacy
organization;
(v) Two representatives of electric companies in the State;
(vi) One representative of a light–duty plug–in electric drive vehicle
manufacturer;
(vii) One representative of a heavy–duty plug–in electric drive vehicle
manufacturer;
(viii) One representative of a manufacturer of plug–in electric drive
vehicle charging stations;
(ix) One representative of manufacturers of fuel cell electric vehicles;
(x) One representative of manufacturers of fuel cell electric vehicle
infrastructure equipment;
(xi) One representative of fleet vehicle operators;
(xii) One representative of electrical workers;
(xiii) Two representatives of the environmental community;

HOUSE BILL 1427
(xiv) One public member with expertise in energy or transportation
policy;
(xv) One representative of a new vehicle dealer association in the
State;
(xvi) One representative of the retail electric supplier community; and
(xvii) One representative of an automotive dismantler and recycler
that dismantles, destroys, or recycles zero emission electric vehicles and that, if applicable,
recycles lithium–ion batteries.
(d) The Governor shall designate the chair or cochairs of the Council.
(e) The Department shall provide staff support to the Council with the assistance
of the Maryland Energy Administration and the Maryland Public Service Commission.
(f) A member of the Council:
(1) May not receive compensation as a member of the Council; but
(2) Is entitled to reimbursement of expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Council shall:
(1) Develop an action plan to facilitate the successful integration of zero
emission electric vehicles into the State’s transportation network;
(2) Assist in developing and coordinating statewide standards for
streamlined permitting and installation of residential and commercial electric vehicle
charging and hydrogen refueling stations and supply equipment;
(3) Develop a recommendation for a statewide electric vehicle charging and
hydrogen refueling infrastructure plan, including placement opportunities for public
charging and hydrogen refueling stations;
(4) Increase consumer awareness and demand for zero emission electric
vehicles through public outreach;
(5) Make recommendations regarding monetary and nonmonetary
incentives to support zero emission electric vehicle ownership and maximize private sector
investment in zero emission electric vehicles;
(6) Develop targeted policies to support fleet purchases of zero emission
electric vehicles;

HOUSE BILL 1427 5
(7) Develop charging solutions for existing and future multidwelling units;
(8) Develop model procurement practices for light–duty vehicles that
include an evaluation of the vehicle life cycle costs inclusive of estimated fuel cost over the
anticipated life of the vehicle;
(9) Encourage local and regional efforts to promote the use of electric
vehicles and attract federal funding for State and local zero emission electric vehicle
programs;
(10) Recommend policies that support zero emission electric vehicle
charging and hydrogen refueling from clean energy sources;
(11) Recommend a method of displaying pricing information at public
charging and hydrogen refueling stations;
(12) Establish performance measures for meeting zero emission electric
vehicle–related employment, infrastructure, and regulatory goals; [and]
(13) STUDY AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON DESIGN ELEMENTS
FOR INCREASING SAFETY AT ELECTRIC VEHICLE CHARGING STATIONS, INCLUDING:
(I) IMPROVED LIGHTING;
(II) MONITORING BY SECURITY CAMERAS;
(III) SMART PHONE APPLICATIONS AIMED AT REPORTING
INCIDENTS TO LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT;
(IV) EMERGENCY BLUE LIGHTS; AND
(V) POTENTIAL METHODS FOR THE OCCUPANT OF AN ELECTRIC
VEHICLE TO SAFELY DISCONNECT FROM A CHARGING STATION WITHOUT HAVING TO
EXIT THE VEHICLE;
(14) STUDY AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS ON IMPROVING THE
RELIABILITY OF CURRENT CHARGING STATIONS; AND
[(13)] (15) Pursue other goals and objectives that promote the utilization of
zero emission electric vehicles in the State.
(h) (1) On or before December 1, 2024, and December 1, 2025, the Council shall
submit interim reports of its work and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.

HOUSE BILL 1427
(2) On or before June 30, 2026, the Council shall submit a final report of
its work and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.